New York, session 2025-2026, A3071.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The social services law is amended by adding a new section 2 368-g to read as follows: 3 § 368-g. Dental health demonstration project. The department shall 4 authorize a five-year demonstration project in the county of Monroe for 5 the purpose of providing reimbursement to providers for eligible dental 6 diagnostic services for eligible populations. Such populations shall 7 include pregnant persons and postpartum persons for the period of twelve 8 months following birth that are enrolled in medical assistance under 9 this title. Such diagnostic services shall include clinical diagnostic 10 services facilitated by artificial intelligence to treat existing dental 11 problems, testing, self-direct imagery or patient encounters for the 12 purpose of following up on any of the aforementioned. The demonstration 13 project shall utilize community health workers for the purpose of educa- 14 tion, data collection and training of the eligible population. The 15 department shall set rates of payment for such diagnostic services on a 16 per diem basis. The department shall ensure that services provided 17 under this demonstration project are not duplicative of currently 18 covered services. Funding for such demonstration shall be up to six 19 hundred thousand dollars annually, subject to appropriation. At the 20 conclusion of the demonstration the participating provider shall provide 21 a report to the department of health on the evaluation, efficacy, cost- 22 savings, if any, and health outcomes of the demonstration project. 23 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 24 deemed repealed 5 years after such date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03266-05-5